Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1894.1] Plan of action.
Prior to the initiation of any projects or activities authorized by section
304A-2169.1, the Hawaii natural energy institute shall develop a plan of action
in coordination with the state energy resources coordinator with the intent of
promoting effective prioritization and focusing of efforts consistent with the
State's energy programs. [L 2014, c 107, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next